Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [97B.902] OPENING HOUR FOR TRAPPING SEASONS. new text end new text begin A season for taking fur-bearing animals by trapping begins at sunrise on the opening day prescribed by rule adopted by the commissioner. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.931, is amended to read: 97B.931 TENDING TRAPS. Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Restrictionsdeleted text end new text begin Using lights to tend trapsnew text end . deleted text begin A person may not tend a trap set for wild animals between 10:00 p.m. and 5:00 a.m. Between 5:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m.deleted text end A person on foot may use a portable artificial light to tend traps. While using a light in the field, the person may not possess or use a firearm other than a handgun or rifle capable of firing only rimfire cartridges of .17 or .22 caliber including .22 magnum. Subd. 2. Body-gripping traps. A body-gripping, conibear-type trap need not be tended more frequently than once every third calendar day. new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Snares. new text end new text begin Snares that are not capable of drowning the captured animal need not be tended more frequently than once every third calendar day, and any animal captured must be removed from the snare. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.945, is amended to read: 97B.945 SETTING TRAPS NEAR WATER RESTRICTED. new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Except as provided in paragraph (b), new text end a person may not set a trap within 50 feet of any water other than temporary surface water within 30 days before the open season for mink and muskrat without a special permit by the commissioner. new text begin (b) A person may set a foot-encapsulating trap within 50 feet of any water other than temporary surface water within 30 days before the open season for mink and muskrat without a special permit by the commissioner. For purposes of this paragraph, "foot-encapsulating trap" means a trap for which: new text end new text begin (1) the triggering and restraining mechanisms are enclosed within a housing and are only accessible through a single opening when set; and new text end new text begin (2) the opening does not exceed two inches in diameter. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, part 6234.2400, subpart 10, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Rule: 25-01247 6234.2400 SPECIAL RESTRICTIONS ON USE OF SNARES. § Subp. 10. Tending snares. All snares not capable of drowning the captured animal must be tended at least once each calendar day and any animal captured must be removed from the snare.